District of Columbia statutes.
48-301

Immunity from liability.

(a)

All other provisions of law notwithstanding, a good faith donor of food which is not known or believed to be unfit for human consumption, as defined in Chapter 1 of this title, or rules issued pursuant to that chapter at the time it is donated to a bona fide charitable or not-for-profit organization shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability arising from an injury or death due to the condition of such food unless such injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of such donor.

(b)

All other provisions of law notwithstanding, a bona fide charitable or not-for-profit organization which in good faith receives and distributes food which is not known or believed to be unfit for human consumption, as defined in Chapter 1 of this title, or rules issued pursuant to that chapter at the time it is distributed, without charge or at a nominal charge, shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability arising from an injury or death due to the condition of such food unless such injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of such organization.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-39, § 2, 28 DCR 3391
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-245, § 2, 38 DCR 367
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 3, 49 DCR 1945
1981 Ed., § 33-801.
D.C. Law 14-116, in subsec. (a), substituted “Chapter 1 of this title, or rules issued pursuant to that chapter” for “§ 8-6:102 of Title 8 of the District of Columbia Health Regulations (published as Title 8 of the District of Columbia Regulations; 1962 Revision, as amended) (’Health Regulations’)”; and, in subsec. (b), substituted “Chapter 1, of this title, or rules issued pursuant to that chapter” for “§ 8-6:102 of Title 8 of the Health Regulations”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).
Section 8-6:102 of Title 8 of the District of Columbia Health Regulations, referred to in (a) has been superseded by the DCMR. See now 23 DCMR 9902.